Florida, session 2026, SB806.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 31 32 Section 1.âThe Division of Law Revision is directed to 33 create part XIV of chapter 559, Florida Statutes, consisting of 34 ss. 559.971-559.976, Florida Statutes, to be entitled âDigital 35 Right to Repair.â 36 Section 2.âSection 559.971, Florida Statutes, is created to 37 read: 38 559.971âShort title.âThis part may be cited as the 39 âPortable Wireless Device Repair Act.â 40 Section 3.âSection 559.972, Florida Statutes, is created to 41 read: 42 559.972âDefinitions.âAs used in this act, the term: 43 (1)ââAuthorized repair providerâ means an individual or a 44 business that is unaffiliated with the manufacturer and has an 45 arrangement with the manufacturer under which the manufacturer 46 grants to the individual or business a license to use a trade 47 name, service mark, or other proprietary identifier for the 48 diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of portable wireless devices 49 under the name of the manufacturer, or any other arrangement 50 with the manufacturer to offer services on behalf of the 51 manufacturer. A manufacturer that offers the services of 52 diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of portable wireless devices 53 manufactured by the manufacturer or on the manufacturerâs 54 behalf, or sold or otherwise supplied by the manufacturer, and 55 that does not do so exclusively through one or more arrangements 56 as described in this subsection with an unaffiliated individual 57 or business, is deemed to be an authorized repair provider of 58 portable wireless devices. 59 (2)ââDocumentationâ means a manual, a diagram, a reporting 60 output, a service code description, a schematic, a security code 61 or a password, or any other information used in the diagnosis, 62 maintenance, or repair of portable wireless devices. 63 (3)ââFair and reasonable terms,â for purposes of obtaining 64 a part, a tool, or documentation, means costs and terms that are 65 equivalent to the most favorable costs and terms under which the 66 manufacturer offers the part, tool, or documentation to an 67 authorized repair provider, accounting for any discount, rebate, 68 convenient and timely means of delivery, means of enabling fully 69 restored and updated functionality, rights of use, or other 70 incentive or preference that the manufacturer offers to an 71 authorized repair provider or any additional cost, burden, or 72 impediment that the manufacturer imposes on an owner or 73 independent repair provider. For documentation, including any 74 relevant updates, the term also means at no charge, except that, 75 when the documentation is requested in print form, a charge may 76 be included for the reasonable actual costs of preparing and 77 mailing the documentation. 78 (4)ââIndependent repair providerâ means an individual or a 79 business that does not have an arrangement with a manufacturer 80 as an authorized repair provider and that is not affiliated with 81 any other individual or business that has such an arrangement 82 with the manufacturer when that individual or business 83 diagnoses, maintains, or repairs portable wireless devices. The 84 term includes a manufacturer or an independent repair provider 85 that diagnoses, maintains, or repairs portable wireless devices 86 that are not manufactured by or on behalf of, or sold or 87 otherwise supplied by, the manufacturer. 88 (5)ââManufacturerâ means an individual or a business that 89 sells, leases, or otherwise supplies new portable wireless 90 devices, or parts of new portable wireless devices, manufactured 91 by or on behalf of the individual or business to another 92 individual or business. 93 (6)ââOwnerâ means an individual or a business that lawfully 94 acquires a portable wireless device purchased or used in this 95 state. 96 (7)ââPartâ means any replacement component made available 97 by or to a manufacturer for the purpose of maintaining or 98 repairing portable wireless devices manufactured by or on behalf 99 of, sold by, or otherwise supplied by the manufacturer. 100 (8)ââPortable wireless deviceâ means a product that 101 includes a battery, microphone, speaker, and display designed to 102 send and receive transmissions through a cellular radio- 103 telephone service. The term does not include a motor vehicle or 104 any product or service manufactured or sold by a motor vehicle 105 manufacturer or motor vehicle dealer. 106 (9)ââToolâ means any software program, hardware implement, 107 or other apparatus used for diagnosing, maintaining, or 108 repairing portable wireless devices, including software or other 109 mechanisms that program or repair a part, calibrate 110 functionality, or perform any other function required to bring 111 portable wireless devices back to fully functional condition. 112 (10)ââTrade secretâ has the same meaning as in s. 688.002. 113 Section 4.âSection 559.973, Florida Statutes, is created to 114 read: 115 559.973âRequirements.â 116 (1)âA manufacturer must make available to an owner of a 117 portable wireless device and to an independent repair provider 118 of such device, on fair and reasonable terms, documentation, 119 parts, and tools, inclusive of any updates, for diagnosing, 120 maintaining, or repairing such device. This subsection does not 121 require a manufacturer to provide a part that is no longer 122 available to the manufacturer. 123 (2)âA manufacturer that sells diagnostic, service, or 124 repair information to an independent repair provider or any 125 other third-party provider in a format that is standardized with 126 other manufacturers, and in a manner and on terms and conditions 127 more favorable than the manner and terms and conditions pursuant 128 to which an authorized repair provider obtains the same 129 diagnostic, service, or repair information, may not require an 130 authorized repair provider to continue purchasing diagnostic, 131 service, or repair information in a proprietary format, unless 132 such proprietary format includes diagnostic, service, repair, or 133 dealership operations information or functionality that is not 134 available in such standardized format. 135 Section 5.âSection 559.974, Florida Statutes, is created to 136 read: 137 559.974âEnforcement.â 138 (1)(a)âAn independent repair provider or owner who believes 139 that a manufacturer has failed to provide documentation, parts, 140 or tools for diagnosing, maintaining, or repairing a portable 141 wireless device as required by this part must notify the 142 manufacturer in writing and give the manufacturer 30 days 143 following receipt of notice to cure the failure. If the 144 manufacturer responds to the notice and cures the failure within 145 the cure period, damages are limited to actual damages in any 146 subsequent litigation. 147 (b)âIf a manufacturer fails to respond to the notice 148 provided under paragraph (a), or if an independent repair 149 provider or owner is not satisfied with the manufacturerâs cure, 150 the independent repair provider or owner may file a complaint in 151 the circuit court of the county in which the independent repair 152 provider has his, her, or its principal place of business or in 153 which the owner resides. The complaint must include the 154 following: 155 1.âWritten information confirming that the independent 156 repair provider or owner has attempted to acquire and use, 157 through the then-available standard support function provided by 158 the manufacturer, relevant documentation, parts, and tools, 159 including communicating with customer assistance. 160 2.âEvidence of manufacturer notification as required by 161 paragraph (a). 162 (2)âIn addition to the remedy provided under subsection 163 (1), a violation of this part is a deceptive and unfair trade 164 practice under the Florida Deceptive and Unfair Trade Practices 165 Act. All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the 166 enforcing authority by that act are available for the 167 enforcement of this part. 168 Section 6.âSection 559.975, Florida Statutes, is created to 169 read: 170 559.975âLimitations.â 171 (1)âThis part does not require a manufacturer to divulge a 172 trade secret, except as necessary to provide documentation, 173 parts, and tools on fair and reasonable terms. 174 (2)âThis part does not require a manufacturer or an 175 authorized repair provider to provide an owner or independent 176 repair provider access to nondiagnostic and nonrepair 177 information provided by a manufacturer to an authorized repair 178 provider. 179 Section 7.âSection 559.976, Florida Statutes, is created to 180 read: 181 559.976âApplicability.â 182 (1)âThis part applies to portable wireless devices sold or 183 in use on or after July 1, 2026. 184 (2)âThis part does not apply to portable wireless devices 185 approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration, 186 security or life-safety systems and devices, or manufacturers of 187 security or life-safety systems and devices. 188 Section 8.âSection 686.35, Florida Statutes, is created to 189 read: 190 686.35âAgricultural Equipment Fair Repair Act.â 191 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 192 (a)ââAuthorized repair providerâ means an individual or 193 entity that has an arrangement for a definite or indefinite 194 period in which an original equipment manufacturer grants to a 195 separate individual or entity a license to use a trade name, 196 service mark, or related characteristic for the purpose of 197 offering repair services under the name of the original 198 equipment manufacturer. 199 (b)ââEmbedded softwareâ means any programmable instructions 200 provided on firmware delivered with equipment for the purpose of 201 equipment operation, including all relevant patches and fixes 202 made by the original equipment manufacturer for this purpose. 203 The term includes, but is not limited to, a basic internal 204 operating system, an internal operating system, a machine code, 205 an assembly code, a robot code, or a microcode. 206 (c)ââEquipmentâ means digital electronic equipment, or a 207 part for such equipment, which is originally manufactured for 208 agricultural equipment, including combines, tractors, 209 implements, self-propelled equipment, and related attachments 210 and implements, and which is manufactured for distribution and 211 sale in this state. 212 (d)ââFair and reasonable termsâ means an equitable price in 213 light of relevant factors, including, but not limited to: 214 1.âThe net cost to the authorized repair provider for 215 similar information obtained from an original equipment 216 manufacturer, excluding any applicable discount, rebate, or 217 other incentive program; 218 2.âThe cost to the original equipment manufacturer for 219 preparing and distributing the information, excluding any 220 research and development costs incurred in designing and 221 implementing, upgrading, or altering the product, but including 222 amortized capital costs for the preparation and distribution of 223 the information; 224 3.âThe price charged by other original equipment 225 manufacturers for similar information; 226 4.âThe price charged by original equipment manufacturers 227 for similar information before the launch of original equipment 228 manufacturer websites; 229 5.âThe ability of aftermarket technicians or shops to 230 afford the information; 231 6.âThe means by which the information is distributed; 232 7.âThe extent to which the information is used, including 233 the number of users and the frequency, duration, and volume of 234 use; and 235 8.âInflation. 236 (e)ââFirmwareâ means a software program or set of 237 instructions programmed on a hardware device to allow the device 238 to communicate with other computer hardware. 239 (f)ââIndependent repair providerâ means a person or 240 business operating in this state which is not affiliated with an 241 original equipment manufacturer or an original equipment 242 manufacturerâs authorized repair provider and which is engaged 243 in the diagnosis, service, maintenance, or repair of equipment. 244 However, an original equipment manufacturer meets the definition 245 of an independent repair provider if such original equipment 246 manufacturer engages in the diagnosis, service, maintenance, or 247 repair of equipment that is not affiliated with the original 248 equipment manufacturer. 249 (g)ââOriginal equipment manufacturerâ means a person or 250 business that, in the ordinary course of business, is engaged in 251 the selling or leasing of new equipment to a person or business 252 and is engaged in the diagnosis, service, maintenance, or repair 253 of such equipment. 254 (h)ââOwnerâ means a person or business that owns or leases 255 a digital electronic product purchased or used in this state. 256 (i)ââPartâ means a replacement part, either new or used, 257 which the original equipment manufacturer makes available to the 258 authorized repair provider for the purpose of effecting repair. 259 (j)ââTrade secretâ means anything, whether tangible or 260 intangible, electronically stored or kept, which constitutes, 261 represents, evidences, or records intellectual property, 262 including secret or confidentially held designs, processes, 263 procedures, formulas, inventions, or improvements or secret or 264 confidentially held scientific, technical, merchandising, 265 production, financial, business, or management information. The 266 term also includes any other trade secret as defined in 18 267 U.S.C. s. 1839. 268 (2)âFor equipment sold and used in this state, the original 269 equipment manufacturer shall make available diagnostic and 270 repair information, including repair technical updates and 271 corrections to embedded software, to any independent repair 272 provider or owner of equipment manufactured by such original 273 equipment manufacturer. The information must be made available 274 for no charge or must be provided in the same manner as the 275 original equipment manufacturer makes such diagnostic and repair 276 information available to an authorized repair provider. 277 Thereafter, the original equipment manufacturer is not 278 responsible for the content and functionality of such 279 aftermarket diagnostic tools, diagnostics, or service 280 information systems. 281 (3)âOriginal equipment manufactured by the original 282 equipment manufacturer which is sold or used in this state to 283 provide security-related functions may not exclude from 284 information provided to an owner or an independent repair 285 provider any diagnostic, service, and repair information 286 necessary to reset a security-related electronic function. If 287 such information is excluded under this section, the information 288 necessary to reset an immobilizer system or a security-related 289 electronic module must be obtainable by an owner or an 290 independent repair provider through the appropriate secure data 291 release system. 292 (4)âThis section may not be construed to do any of the 293 following: 294 (a)âRequire an original equipment manufacturer to divulge a 295 trade secret. 296 (b)âAbrogate, interfere with, contradict, or alter the 297 terms of an agreement executed and in force between an 298 authorized repair provider and an original equipment 299 manufacturer, including, but not limited to, the performance or 300 provision of warranty or recall repair work by an authorized 301 repair provider on behalf of an original equipment manufacturer 302 pursuant to such authorized repair agreement, except that any 303 provision in such an authorized repair agreement which purports 304 to waive, avoid, restrict, or limit an original equipment 305 manufacturerâs compliance with this section is void and 306 unenforceable. 307 (c)âRequire original equipment manufacturers or authorized 308 repair providers to provide an owner or an independent repair 309 provider access to nondiagnostic and nonrepair information 310 provided by an original equipment manufacturer to an authorized 311 repair provider pursuant to the terms of an authorized repair 312 agreement. 313 (5)âAn original equipment manufacturer found in violation 314 of this section is liable for a civil penalty of not more than 315 $500 for each violation. 316 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.